Montana, session 2025, SB513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Direction to department in administering family education and
support services program. (1) The department of public health and human services shall adjust its capacity
by July 1, 2026, to meet the demand of all qualified families applying to the family education and support
services program authorized under 53-20-205.
(2) The department shall report annually to the children, families, health, and human services
interim committee in accordance with 5-11-210 on:
(a) how participating families are benefitting from the program;
(b) the ability of the program to prepare and position the family to better use future state health
care programs; and
(c) the aggregated comparative experiences of families who receive program services compared
with families who do not.
(3) It is the intent of the legislature that the program serve a similar number of qualified families as
were served in fiscal year 2016.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 513